Illinois, session 104th, HB4084.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7)7    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 8    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 9record that contains information that is exempt from 10disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 11that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 12to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 13shall make the remaining information available for inspection 14and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 15be exempt from inspection and copying: 16        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 17    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 18    regulations implementing federal or State law. 19        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 20    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 21    or a court order. 22        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 23    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and   HB4084- 2 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    specifically designed to provide information to one or 2    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 3    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 4        (c) Personal information contained within public 5    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 6    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 7    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 8    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 9    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 10    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 11    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 12    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 13    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 14    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 15    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 16    privacy. 17        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 18    created in the course of administrative enforcement 19    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 20    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 21    extent that disclosure would: 22            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 23        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 24        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 25        agency that is the recipient of the request; 26            (ii) interfere with active administrative   HB4084- 3 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 2        that is the recipient of the request; 3            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 4        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 5        hearing; 6            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 7        confidential source, confidential information 8        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 9        who file complaints with or provide information to 10        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 11        penal agencies; except that the identities of 12        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 13        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 14        local government, except when disclosure would 15        interfere with an active criminal investigation 16        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 17        request; 18            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 19        techniques other than those generally used and known 20        or disclose internal documents of correctional 21        agencies related to detection, observation, or 22        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 23        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 24        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 25        request; 26            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law   HB4084- 4 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 2            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 3        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 4        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 5    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 6    record management system if the law enforcement agency 7    that is the recipient of the request did not create the 8    record, did not participate in or have a role in any of the 9    events which are the subject of the record, and only has 10    access to the record through the shared electronic record 11    management system. 12        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 13    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 14    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 15    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 16    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 17    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 18    Board. 19        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 20    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 21    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 22        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 23    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 24        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 25    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 26    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those   HB4084- 5 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    materials are available in the library of the correctional 2    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 3    confined. 4        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 5    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 6    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 7    materials include records from staff members' personnel 8    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 9    information. 10        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 11    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 12    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 13    through an administrative request to the Department of 14    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 15    Mental Health. 16        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 17    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 18    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 19    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 20    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 21    institution or facility.22        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 23    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 24    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 25    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 26    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited   HB4084- 6 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 2    or school address, work telephone number, social security 3    number, or any other identifying information, except as 4    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 5    or claim. 6        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 7    requested by a person committed to the Department of 8    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 9    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 10    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 11    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 12    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 13    claim. 14        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 15    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 16    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 17    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 18    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 19    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 20    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 21    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 22    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 23        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 24    information obtained from a person or business where the 25    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 26    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary,   HB4084- 7 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 2    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 3    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 4    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 5    requested.6        The information included under this exemption includes 7    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 8    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 9    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 10    company within the investment portfolio of a private 11    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 12    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 13    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 14    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 15    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 16    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 17    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 18    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 19    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 20    privately held company may cause competitive harm.21        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 22    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 23    to disclosure. 24        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 25    agreement, including information which if it were 26    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage   HB4084- 8 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 2    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 3    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 4    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 5    award or final selection is made. 6        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 7    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 8    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 9    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 10    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 11    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 12    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 13    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 14    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 15    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 16    legal rights of the general public. 17        (j) The following information pertaining to 18    educational matters:19            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 20        examination data used to administer an academic 21        examination; 22            (ii) information received by a primary or 23        secondary school, college, or university under its 24        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 25        their academic peers; 26            (iii) information concerning a school or   HB4084- 9 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 2        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 3        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and4            (iv) course materials or research materials used 5        by faculty members. 6        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 7    submissions, and other construction related technical 8    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 9    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 10    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 11    including, but not limited to, power generating and 12    distribution stations and other transmission and 13    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 14    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 15    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 16    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 17    security. 18        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 19    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 20    public body makes the minutes available to the public 21    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 22        (m) Communications between a public body and an 23    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 24    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 25    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 26    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative   HB4084- 10 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 2    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 3    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 4        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 5    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 6    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 7    cases in which discipline is imposed. 8        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 9    with automated data processing operations, including, but 10    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 11    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 12    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 13    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 14    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 15    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 16    security of the system or its data or the security of 17    materials exempt under this Section. 18        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 19    between public bodies and their employees or 20    representatives, except that any final contract or 21    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 22        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 23    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 24    an applicant for a license or employment. 25        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 26    to real estate purchase negotiations until those   HB4084- 11 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 2    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 3    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 4    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 5    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 6    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 7    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 8    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 9    until a sale is consummated. 10        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 11    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 12    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 13    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 14    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 15    intergovernmental risk management association or 16    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 17    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 18        (t) Information contained in or related to 19    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 20    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 21    for the regulation or supervision of financial 22    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 23    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 24    law. 25        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 26    the disclosure of secret or confidential information,   HB4084- 12 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 2    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 3    Electronic Transactions Act. 4        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 5    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 6    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 7    community's population or systems, facilities, or 8    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 9    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 10    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 11    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 12    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 13    include such things as details pertaining to the 14    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 15    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 16    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 17        (w) (Blank). 18        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 19    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 20    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 21    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 22    Illinois Power Agency. 23        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 24    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 25    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 26    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities   HB4084- 13 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 2    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 3    Commission. 4        (z) Information about students exempted from 5    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 6    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 7    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 8    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 9    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 10        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 11    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 12        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 13    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 14    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 15    Mortality Review Team Act. 16        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 17    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 18    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 19    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.20        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 21    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 22    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 23    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 24        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 25    information of persons who are minors and are also 26    participants and registrants in programs of park   HB4084- 14 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 2    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 3    associations.4        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 5    information of participants and registrants in programs of 6    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 7    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 8    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 9    minors.10        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 11    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 12    2012. 13        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 14    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 15    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 16    School Code and any information contained in that report. 17        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 18    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 19    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 20    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 21    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 22    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 23    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 24    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 25    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 26    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of   HB4084- 15 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    Corrections.2        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 3    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 4        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 5    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 6    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 7    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 8    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 9    of a governmental entity or a person. 10        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 11    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 12    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 13    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 14    the procedure.15        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 16    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 17    Confidential Reporting Act. 18        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 19    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 20    Act. 21        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 22    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 23        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 24    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 25    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 26    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological   HB4084- 16 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 2    Act.3        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 4    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 5        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 6    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 7        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 8    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 9    protected health information, including demographic 10    information, that may be contained within or extracted 11    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 12    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 13    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 14    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 15    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 16    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 17    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 18    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 19    160.103. 20        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 21    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 22    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 23    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 24    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 25Government Official Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted 26from public records prior to disclosure under this Act.   HB4084- 17 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 2public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 3agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 4behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 5governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 6Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 7for purposes of this Act. 8    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 9information or limit the availability of records to the 10public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 11in this Act. 12(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 13102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-752, eff. 5-6-22; 102-753, eff. 141-1-23; 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-791, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, 15eff. 7-1-23; 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 16103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 178-4-23; 103-540, eff. 1-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 18eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.) 19    Section 10. The Election Code is amended by changing 20Sections 7A-1 and 10-10.5 as follows: 21    (10 ILCS 5/7A-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7A-1)22    Sec. 7A-1. Any Supreme, Appellate or Circuit Judge who has 23been elected to that office and who seeks to be retained in 24that office under subsection (d) of Section 12 of Article VI of   HB4084- 18 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1the Constitution shall file a declaration of candidacy to 2succeed himself in the office of the Secretary of State not 3less than 6 months before the general election preceding the 4expiration of his term of office. Within 3 business days 5thereafter, the Secretary of State shall certify to the State 6Board of Elections the names of all incumbent judges who were 7eligible to stand for retention at the next general election 8but failed to timely file a declaration of candidacy to 9succeed themselves in office or, having timely filed such a 10declaration, withdrew it. The State Board of Elections may 11rely upon the certification from the Secretary of State (a) to 12determine when vacancies in judicial office exist and (b) to 13determine the judicial positions for which elections will be 14held. The Secretary of State, not less than 63 days before the 15election, shall certify the Judge's candidacy to the proper 16election officials. The names of Judges seeking retention 17shall be submitted to the electors, separately and without 18party designation, on the sole question whether each Judge 19shall be retained in office for another term. The retention 20elections shall be conducted at general elections in the 21appropriate Judicial District, for Supreme and Appellate 22Judges, and in the circuit for Circuit Judges. The affirmative 23vote of three-fifths of the electors voting on the question 24shall elect the Judge to the office for a term commencing on 25the first Monday in December following his election.26    Upon certification of a Judge's candidacy for retention by   HB4084- 19 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1the Secretary of State, the judicial candidate may file a 2written request with the Secretary of State for redaction of 3the judicial candidate's home address information from the 4candidate's declaration of candidacy for retention. After 5receipt of the candidate's written request, the Secretary of 6State shall redact or cause redaction of the judicial 7candidate's home address from the candidate's declaration of 8candidacy for retention within 5 business days. For the 9purposes of this subsection, "home address" has the meaning as 10defined in Section 1-10 of the Government Official Judicial 11Privacy Act.12(Source: P.A. 96-886, eff. 1-1-11; 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.) 13    (10 ILCS 5/10-10.5)14    Sec. 10-10.5. Removal of judicial officer's address 15information from the certificate of nomination or nomination 16papers.17    (a) Upon expiration of the period for filing an objection 18to a judicial candidate's certificate of nomination or 19nomination papers, a judicial officer who is a judicial 20candidate may file a written request with the State Board of 21Elections for redaction of the judicial officer's home address 22information from his or her certificate of nomination or 23nomination papers. After receipt of the judicial officer's 24written request, the State Board of Elections shall redact or 25cause redaction of the judicial officer's home address from   HB4084- 20 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1his or her certificate of nomination or nomination papers 2within 5 business days.3    (b) Prior to expiration of the period for filing an 4objection to a judicial candidate's certificate of nomination 5or nomination papers, the home address information from the 6certificate of nomination or nomination papers of a judicial 7officer who is a judicial candidate is available for public 8inspection. After redaction of a judicial officer's home 9address information under paragraph (a) of this Section, the 10home address information is only available for an in camera 11inspection by the court reviewing an objection to the judicial 12officer's certificate of nomination or nomination papers. 13    (c) For the purposes of this Section, "home address" has 14the meaning as defined in Section 1-10 of the Government 15Official Judicial Privacy Act. 16(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12; 98-463, eff. 8-16-13.) 17    Section 15. The Illinois Identification Card Act is 18amended by changing Sections 4 and 5 as follows: 19    (15 ILCS 335/4)  (from Ch. 124, par. 24)20    Sec. 4. Identification card. 21    (a) In accordance with the requirements of this Section, 22the Secretary of State shall issue a standard Illinois 23Identification Card, as well as a mobile Illinois 24Identification Card, to any natural person who is a resident   HB4084- 21 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1of the State of Illinois who applies for such a card, or 2renewal thereof. No identification card shall be issued to any 3person who holds a valid foreign state identification card, 4license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to the 5Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 6card, license, or permit. The card shall be prepared and 7supplied by the Secretary of State and shall include a 8photograph and signature or mark of the applicant. However, 9the Secretary of State may provide by rule for the issuance of 10Illinois Identification Cards without photographs if the 11applicant has a bona fide religious objection to being 12photographed or to the display of his or her photograph. The 13Illinois Identification Card may be used for identification 14purposes in any lawful situation only by the person to whom it 15was issued. As used in this Act, "photograph" means any color 16photograph or digitally produced and captured image of an 17applicant for an identification card. As used in this Act, 18"signature" means the name of a person as written by that 19person and captured in a manner acceptable to the Secretary of 20State.21    (a-5) If an applicant for an identification card has a 22current driver's license or instruction permit issued by the 23Secretary of State, the Secretary may require the applicant to 24utilize the same residence address and name on the 25identification card, driver's license, and instruction permit 26records maintained by the Secretary. The Secretary may   HB4084- 22 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1promulgate rules to implement this provision. 2    (a-10) If the applicant is a judicial officer as defined 3in Section 1-10 of the Government Official Judicial Privacy 4Act or a peace officer, the applicant may elect to have his or 5her office or work address listed on the card instead of the 6applicant's residence or mailing address. The Secretary may 7promulgate rules to implement this provision. For the purposes 8of this subsection (a-10), "peace officer" means any person 9who by virtue of his or her office or public employment is 10vested by law with a duty to maintain public order or to make 11arrests for a violation of any penal statute of this State, 12whether that duty extends to all violations or is limited to 13specific violations. 14    (a-15) The Secretary of State may provide for an expedited 15process for the issuance of an Illinois Identification Card. 16The Secretary shall charge an additional fee for the expedited 17issuance of an Illinois Identification Card, to be set by 18rule, not to exceed $75. All fees collected by the Secretary 19for expedited Illinois Identification Card service shall be 20deposited into the Secretary of State Special Services Fund. 21The Secretary may adopt rules regarding the eligibility, 22process, and fee for an expedited Illinois Identification 23Card. If the Secretary of State determines that the volume of 24expedited identification card requests received on a given day 25exceeds the ability of the Secretary to process those requests 26in an expedited manner, the Secretary may decline to provide   HB4084- 23 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1expedited services, and the additional fee for the expedited 2service shall be refunded to the applicant. 3    (a-20) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 4Illinois Identification Card to a person committed to the 5Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 6a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 7county jail or county department of corrections as follows: if 8the person has a social security number,9        (1) A committed person who has previously held an 10    Illinois Identification Card or an Illinois driver's 11    license shall submit an Identification Card verification 12    form to the Secretary of State, including a photograph 13    taken by the correctional facility, proof of residency 14    upon discharge, and a social security number, if the 15    committed person has a social security number. If the 16    committed person does not have a social security number 17    and is eligible for a social security number, the 18    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois 19    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a 20    social security number. If the committed person's 21    photograph and demographic information matches an existing 22    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 23    and the Secretary of State verifies the applicant's social 24    security number with the Social Security Administration, 25    the Secretary of State shall issue the committed person a 26    standard Illinois Identification Card. If the photograph   HB4084- 24 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    or demographic information matches an existing Illinois 2    Identification Card or Illinois driver's license in 3    another person's name or identity, a standard Illinois 4    Identification Card shall not be issued until the 5    committed person submits a certified birth certificate and 6    social security card to the Secretary of State and the 7    Secretary of State verifies the identity of the committed 8    person. If the Secretary of State cannot find a match to an 9    existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's 10    license, the committed person may apply for a standard 11    Illinois Identification card as described in paragraph 12    (2).13        (2) A committed person who has not previously held an 14    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 15    or for whom a match cannot be found as described in 16    paragraph (1) shall submit an Illinois Identification Card 17    verification form, including a photograph taken by the 18    correctional facility, a certified birth certificate, 19    proof of residency upon discharge, and a social security 20    number, if the committed has a social security number. If 21    the committed person does not have a social security 22    number and is eligible for a social security number, the 23    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois 24    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a 25    social security number. If the Secretary of State verifies 26    the applicant's social security number with the Social   HB4084- 25 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    Security Administration, the Secretary of State shall 2    issue the committed person a standard Illinois 3    Identification Card.4    The Illinois Identification Card verification form 5described in this subsection shall be prescribed by the 6Secretary of State. The Secretary of State and correctional 7facilities in this State shall establish a secure method to 8transfer the form.9    (a-25) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 10Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a committed 11person upon release on parole, mandatory supervised release, 12aftercare release, final discharge, or pardon from the 13Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 14a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 15county jail or county department of corrections, if the 16released person does not obtain a standard Illinois 17Identification Card as described in subsection (a-20) prior to 18release but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 19Identification Card verification form completed by the 20correctional facility, verifying the released person's date of 21birth, social security number, if the person has a social 22security number, and his or her Illinois residence address. 23The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 24days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 25Identification Card.26    Prior to the expiration of the 90-day period of the   HB4084- 26 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1limited-term Illinois Identification Card, if the released 2person submits to the Secretary of State a certified copy of 3his or her birth certificate and his or her social security 4card, if the person has a social security number, or other 5documents authorized by the Secretary, a standard Illinois 6Identification Card shall be issued. A limited-term Illinois 7Identification Card may not be renewed. 8    This subsection shall not apply to a released person who 9was unable to obtain a standard Illinois Identification Card 10because his or her photograph or demographic information 11matched an existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 12driver's license in another person's name or identity or to a 13released person who does not have a social security number and 14is eligible for a social security number.15    (a-30) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 16Illinois Identification Card to a person upon conditional 17release or absolute discharge from the custody of the 18Department of Human Services, if the person presents a 19certified copy of his or her birth certificate, social 20security card, if the person has a social security number, or 21other documents authorized by the Secretary, and a document 22proving his or her Illinois residence address. The Secretary 23of State shall issue a standard Illinois Identification Card 24to a person prior to his or her conditional release or absolute 25discharge if personnel from the Department of Human Services 26bring the person to a Secretary of State location with the   HB4084- 27 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1required documents. Documents proving residence address may 2include any official document of the Department of Human 3Services showing the person's address after release and a 4Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which may be 5executed by personnel of the Department of Human Services.6    (a-35) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 7Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a person 8upon conditional release or absolute discharge from the 9custody of the Department of Human Services, if the person is 10unable to present a certified copy of his or her birth 11certificate and social security card, if the person has a 12social security number, or other documents authorized by the 13Secretary, but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 14verification form completed by the Department of Human 15Services, verifying the person's date of birth and social 16security number, if the person has a social security number, 17and a document proving his or her Illinois residence address. 18The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 19days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 20Identification Card. The Secretary of State shall issue a 21limited-term Illinois Identification Card to a person no 22sooner than 14 days prior to his or her conditional release or 23absolute discharge if personnel from the Department of Human 24Services bring the person to a Secretary of State location 25with the required documents. Documents proving residence 26address shall include any official document of the Department   HB4084- 28 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1of Human Services showing the person's address after release 2and a Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which 3may be executed by personnel of the Department of Human 4Services. 5    (b) The Secretary of State shall issue a special Illinois 6Identification Card, which shall be known as an Illinois 7Person with a Disability Identification Card, to any natural 8person who is a resident of the State of Illinois, who is a 9person with a disability as defined in Section 4A of this Act, 10who applies for such card, or renewal thereof. No Illinois 11Person with a Disability Identification Card shall be issued 12to any person who holds a valid foreign state identification 13card, license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to 14the Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 15card, license, or permit. The Secretary of State shall charge 16no fee to issue such card. The card shall be prepared and 17supplied by the Secretary of State, and shall include a 18photograph and signature or mark of the applicant, a 19designation indicating that the card is an Illinois Person 20with a Disability Identification Card, and shall include a 21comprehensible designation of the type and classification of 22the applicant's disability as set out in Section 4A of this 23Act. However, the Secretary of State may provide by rule for 24the issuance of Illinois Person with a Disability 25Identification Cards without photographs if the applicant has 26a bona fide religious objection to being photographed or to   HB4084- 29 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1the display of his or her photograph. If the applicant so 2requests, the card shall include a description of the 3applicant's disability and any information about the 4applicant's disability or medical history which the Secretary 5determines would be helpful to the applicant in securing 6emergency medical care. If a mark is used in lieu of a 7signature, such mark shall be affixed to the card in the 8presence of 2 two witnesses who attest to the authenticity of 9the mark. The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification 10Card may be used for identification purposes in any lawful 11situation by the person to whom it was issued.12    The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 13may be used as adequate documentation of disability in lieu of 14a physician's determination of disability, a determination of 15disability from a physician assistant, a determination of 16disability from an advanced practice registered nurse, or any 17other documentation of disability whenever any State law 18requires that a person with a disability provide such 19documentation of disability, however an Illinois Person with a 20Disability Identification Card shall not qualify the 21cardholder to participate in any program or to receive any 22benefit which is not available to all persons with like 23disabilities. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, an 24Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card, or 25evidence that the Secretary of State has issued an Illinois 26Person with a Disability Identification Card, shall not be   HB4084- 30 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1used by any person other than the person named on such card to 2prove that the person named on such card is a person with a 3disability or for any other purpose unless the card is used for 4the benefit of the person named on such card, and the person 5named on such card consents to such use at the time the card is 6so used.7    An optometrist's determination of a visual disability 8under Section 4A of this Act is acceptable as documentation 9for the purpose of issuing an Illinois Person with a 10Disability Identification Card. 11    When medical information is contained on an Illinois 12Person with a Disability Identification Card, the Office of 13the Secretary of State shall not be liable for any actions 14taken based upon that medical information.15    (c) The Secretary of State shall provide that each 16original or renewal Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 17Person with a Disability Identification Card issued to a 18person under the age of 21 shall be of a distinct nature from 19those Illinois Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a 20Disability Identification Cards issued to individuals 21 years 21of age or older. The color designated for Illinois 22Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a Disability 23Identification Cards for persons under the age of 21 shall be 24at the discretion of the Secretary of State.25    (c-1) Each original or renewal Illinois Identification 26Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card   HB4084- 31 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1issued to a person under the age of 21 shall display the date 2upon which the person becomes 18 years of age and the date upon 3which the person becomes 21 years of age.4    (c-3) The General Assembly recognizes the need to identify 5military veterans living in this State for the purpose of 6ensuring that they receive all of the services and benefits to 7which they are legally entitled, including healthcare, 8education assistance, and job placement. To assist the State 9in identifying these veterans and delivering these vital 10services and benefits, the Secretary of State is authorized to 11issue Illinois Identification Cards and Illinois Person with a 12Disability Identification Cards with the word "veteran" 13appearing on the face of the cards. This authorization is 14predicated on the unique status of veterans. The Secretary may 15not issue any other identification card which identifies an 16occupation, status, affiliation, hobby, or other unique 17characteristics of the identification card holder which is 18unrelated to the purpose of the identification card.19    (c-5) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, the Secretary 20of State shall designate a space on each original or renewal 21identification card where, at the request of the applicant, 22the word "veteran" shall be placed. The veteran designation 23shall be available to a person identified as a veteran under 24subsection (b) of Section 5 of this Act who was discharged or 25separated under honorable conditions. 26    (d) The Secretary of State may issue a Senior Citizen   HB4084- 32 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1discount card, to any natural person who is a resident of the 2State of Illinois who is 60 years of age or older and who 3applies for such a card or renewal thereof. The Secretary of 4State shall charge no fee to issue such card. The card shall be 5issued in every county and applications shall be made 6available at, but not limited to, nutrition sites, senior 7citizen centers and Area Agencies on Aging. The applicant, 8upon receipt of such card and prior to its use for any purpose, 9shall have affixed thereon in the space provided therefor his 10signature or mark.11    (e) The Secretary of State, in his or her discretion, may 12designate on each Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 13Person with a Disability Identification Card a space where the 14card holder may place a sticker or decal, issued by the 15Secretary of State, of uniform size as the Secretary may 16specify, that shall indicate in appropriate language that the 17card holder has renewed his or her Illinois Identification 18Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card.19    (f)(1) The Secretary of State may issue a mobile 20identification card to an individual who is otherwise eligible 21to hold a physical credential in addition to, and not instead 22of, an identification card if the Secretary of State has 23issued an identification card to the person. The data elements 24that are used to build an electronic credential must match the 25individual's current Department record.26    (2) The Secretary may enter into agreements or contract   HB4084- 33 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1with an agency of the State, another state, the United States, 2or a third party to facilitate the issuance, use, and 3verification of a mobile identification card issued by the 4Secretary or another state.5    (3) Any mobile identification card issued by the Secretary 6shall be in accordance with the most recent AAMVA standards.7    (4) The Secretary shall design the mobile identification 8card in a manner that allows the credential holder to maintain 9physical possession of the device on which the mobile 10identification card is accessed during verification.11    (g) The verification process shall be implemented to 12require:13        (1) the relying parties to authenticate electronic 14    credentials in accordance with applicable AAMVA standards 15    prior to acceptance of the electronic credential;16        (2) the Secretary to ensure that electronic credential 17    data is subject to all jurisdictional data security and 18    privacy protection laws and regulations; and19        (3) the relying parties to request only electronic 20    credential data elements that are necessary to complete 21    the transaction for which data is being requested.22    (h) Privacy and tracking of data shall be restricted by 23implementing the following requirements:24        (1) the relying parties shall retain only electronic 25    credential data elements for which the relying party 26    explicitly obtained consent from the electronic credential   HB4084- 34 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    holder and shall inform the electronic credential holder 2    of the use and retention period of the electronic data 3    elements;4        (2) the Secretary shall use an electronic credential 5    system that is designed to maximize the privacy of the 6    credential holder in accordance with State and federal law 7    and shall not track or compile information without the 8    credential holder's consent; and9        (3) the Department shall only compile and disclose 10    information regarding the use of the credential as 11    required by State or federal law.12    (i)(1) The electronic credential holder shall be required 13to have the holder's their physical credential on the holder's 14their person for all purposes for which an identification card 15is required. No person, public entity, private entity, or 16agency shall establish a policy that requires an electronic 17credential instead of a physical credential.18    (2) Electronic credential systems shall be designed so 19that there is no requirement for the electronic credential 20holder to display or relinquish possession of the credential 21holder's mobile device to relying parties for the acceptance 22of an electronic credential.23    (3) When required by law and upon request by law 24enforcement, a credential holder must provide the credential 25holder's physical credential.26    (4) Any law or regulation that requires an individual to   HB4084- 35 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1surrender the individual's their physical credential to law 2enforcement does not apply to the device on which an 3electronic credential has been provisioned.4    (j) A person may be required to produce when so requested a 5physical identification card to a law enforcement officer, a 6representative of a State or federal department or agency, or 7a private entity and is subject to all applicable laws and 8consequences for failure to produce such an identification 9card.10    (k) The Secretary of State shall adopt such rules as are 11necessary to implement a mobile identification card.12    (l) The display of a mobile identification card shall not 13serve as consent or authorization for a law enforcement 14officer, or any other person, to search, view, or access any 15other data or application on the mobile device. If a person 16presents the person's mobile device to a law enforcement 17officer for purposes of displaying a mobile identification 18card, the law enforcement officer shall promptly return the 19mobile device to the person once the officer has had an 20opportunity to verify the identity of the person. Except for 21willful and wanton misconduct, any law enforcement officer, 22court, or officer of the court presented with the device shall 23be immune from any liability resulting from damage to the 24mobile device.25    (m) The fee to install the application to display a mobile 26identification card as defined in this subsection shall not   HB4084- 36 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1exceed $6.2    (n) As used in this Section:3    "AAMVA" means the American Association of Motor Vehicle 4Administrators.5    "Credential" means a driver's license, learner's permit, 6or identification card.7    "Credential holder" means the individual to whom a mobile 8driver's license or a mobile identification card is issued.9    "Data element" means a distinct component of a customer's 10information that is found on the Department's customer record.11    "Department" means the Secretary of State Department of 12Driver Services.13    "Electronic credential" means an electronic extension of 14the departmental issued physical credential that conveys 15identity and complies with AAMVA's mobile driver license 16Implementation guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard.17    "Electronic credential system" means a digital process 18that includes a method for provisioning electronic 19credentials, requesting and transmitting electronic credential 20data elements, and performing tasks to maintain the system.21    "Full profile" means all the information provided on an 22identification card.23    "ISO" means the International Organization for 24Standardization, which creates uniform processes and 25procedures. 26    "Limited profile" means a portion of the information   HB4084- 37 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1provided on an Identification Card.2    "Mobile identification card" means a data file that is 3available on any mobile device that has connectivity to the 4Internet through an application that allows the mobile device 5to download the data file from the Secretary of State, that 6contains all the data elements visible on the face and back of 7an identification card, and that displays the current status 8of the identification card. "Mobile identification card" does 9not include a copy, photograph, or image of an Illinois 10Identification Card that is not downloaded through the 11application on a mobile device.12    "Physical credential" means a Department-issued Department 13issued document that conveys identity in accordance with the 14Illinois Identification Card Act.15    "Provision" means the initial loading of an electronic 16credential onto a device.17    "Relying party" means the entity to which the credential 18holder presents the electronic credential.19    "Verification process" means a method of authenticating 20the electronic credential through the use of secured 21encryption communication. 22    (o) (f) Upon providing the required documentation, at the 23request of the applicant, the identification card may reflect 24Gold Star Family designation. The Secretary shall designate a 25space on each original or renewal of an identification card 26for such designation. This designation shall be available to a   HB4084- 38 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1person eligible for Gold Star license plates under subsection 2(f) of Section 6-106 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 3(Source: P.A. 102-299, eff. 8-6-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 4103-345, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-782, eff. 58-6-24; 103-824, eff. 1-1-25; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; revised 611-26-24.) 7    (15 ILCS 335/5)8    Sec. 5. Applications. 9    (a) Any natural person who is a resident of the State of 10Illinois may file an application for an identification card, 11or for the renewal thereof, in a manner prescribed by the 12Secretary. Each original application shall be completed by the 13applicant in full and shall set forth the legal name, 14residence address and zip code, social security number, if the 15person has a social security number, birth date, sex and a 16brief description of the applicant. The applicant shall be 17photographed, unless the Secretary of State has provided by 18rule for the issuance of identification cards without 19photographs and the applicant is deemed eligible for an 20identification card without a photograph under the terms and 21conditions imposed by the Secretary of State, and he or she 22shall also submit any other information as the Secretary may 23deem necessary or such documentation as the Secretary may 24require to determine the identity of the applicant. In 25addition to the residence address, the Secretary may allow the   HB4084- 39 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1applicant to provide a mailing address. If the applicant is an 2employee of the Department of Children and Family Services 3with a job title of "Child Protection Specialist Trainee", 4"Child Protection Specialist", "Child Protection Advanced 5Specialist", "Child Welfare Specialist Trainee", "Child 6Welfare Specialist", or "Child Welfare Advanced Specialist" or 7a judicial officer as defined in Section 1-10 of the 8Government Official Judicial Privacy Act or a peace officer, 9the applicant may elect to have his or her office or work 10address in lieu of the applicant's residence or mailing 11address. An applicant for an Illinois Person with a Disability 12Identification Card must also submit with each original or 13renewal application, on forms prescribed by the Secretary, 14such documentation as the Secretary may require, establishing 15that the applicant is a "person with a disability" as defined 16in Section 4A of this Act, and setting forth the applicant's 17type and class of disability as set forth in Section 4A of this 18Act. For the purposes of this subsection (a), "peace officer" 19means any person who by virtue of his or her office or public 20employment is vested by law with a duty to maintain public 21order or to make arrests for a violation of any penal statute 22of this State, whether that duty extends to all violations or 23is limited to specific violations. 24    (a-5) Upon the first issuance of a request for proposals 25for a digital driver's license and identification card 26issuance and facial recognition system issued after January 1,   HB4084- 40 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b12020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-513), and upon 2implementation of a new or revised system procured pursuant to 3that request for proposals, the Secretary shall permit 4applicants to choose between "male", "female", or "non-binary" 5when designating the applicant's sex on the identification 6card application form. The sex designated by the applicant 7shall be displayed on the identification card issued to the 8applicant. 9    (b) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, for each original 10or renewal identification card application under this Act, the 11Secretary shall inquire as to whether the applicant is a 12veteran for purposes of issuing an identification card with a 13veteran designation under subsection (c-5) of Section 4 of 14this Act. The acceptable forms of proof shall include, but are 15not limited to, Department of Defense form DD-214, Department 16of Defense form DD-256 for applicants who did not receive a 17form DD-214 upon the completion of initial basic training, 18Department of Defense form DD-2 (Retired), an identification 19card issued under the federal Veterans Identification Card Act 20of 2015, or a United States Department of Veterans Affairs 21summary of benefits letter. If the document cannot be stamped, 22the Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs shall provide a 23certificate to the veteran to provide to the Secretary of 24State. The Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs shall 25advise the Secretary as to what other forms of proof of a 26person's status as a veteran are acceptable.  HB4084- 41 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    For each applicant who is issued an identification card 2with a veteran designation, the Secretary shall provide the 3Department of Veterans' Affairs with the applicant's name, 4address, date of birth, gender, and such other demographic 5information as agreed to by the Secretary and the Department. 6The Department may take steps necessary to confirm the 7applicant is a veteran. If after due diligence, including 8writing to the applicant at the address provided by the 9Secretary, the Department is unable to verify the applicant's 10veteran status, the Department shall inform the Secretary, who 11shall notify the applicant that he or she must confirm status 12as a veteran, or the identification card will be canceled 13cancelled. 14    For purposes of this subsection (b):15    "Armed forces" means any of the Armed Forces of the United 16States, including a member of any reserve component or 17National Guard unit. 18    "Veteran" means a person who has served in the armed 19forces and was discharged or separated under honorable 20conditions. 21    (b-1) An applicant who is eligible for Gold Star license 22plates under Section 3-664 of the Illinois Vehicle Code may 23apply for an identification card with space for a designation 24as a Gold Star Family. The Secretary may waive any fee for this 25application. If the Secretary does not waive the fee, any fee 26charged to the applicant must be deposited into the Illinois   HB4084- 42 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1Veterans Assistance Fund. The Secretary is authorized to issue 2rules to implement this subsection. 3    (c) All applicants for REAL ID compliant standard Illinois 4Identification Cards and Illinois Person with a Disability 5Identification Cards shall provide proof of lawful status in 6the United States as defined in 6 CFR 37.3, as amended. 7Applicants who are unable to provide the Secretary with proof 8of lawful status are ineligible for REAL ID compliant 9identification cards under this Act.10    (d) The Secretary of State may accept, as proof of date of 11birth and written signature for any applicant for a standard 12identification card who does not have a social security number 13or documentation issued by the United States Department of 14Homeland Security authorizing the applicant's presence in this 15country, any passport validly issued to the applicant from the 16applicant's country of citizenship or a consular 17identification document validly issued to the applicant by a 18consulate of that country as defined in Section 5 of the 19Consular Identification Document Act. Any such documents must 20be either unexpired or presented by an applicant within 2 21years of its expiration date. 22(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 23103-888, eff. 8-9-24; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; revised 12-1-24.) 24    Section 20. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 25changing Section 3-405 as follows:   HB4084- 43 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    (625 ILCS 5/3-405)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-405)2    Sec. 3-405. Application for registration. 3    (a) Every owner of a vehicle subject to registration under 4this Code shall make application to the Secretary of State for 5the registration of such vehicle upon the appropriate form or 6forms furnished by the Secretary. Every such original 7application shall bear the signature of the owner written with 8pen and ink and contain:9        1. The name, domicile address, as defined in Section 10    1-115.5 of this Code, (except as otherwise provided in 11    this paragraph 1), mail address of the owner or business 12    address of the owner if a firm, association, or 13    corporation, and, if available, email address of the 14    owner. If the mailing address is a post office box number, 15    the address listed on the driver license record may be 16    used to verify residence. A police officer, a deputy 17    sheriff, an elected sheriff, a law enforcement officer for 18    the Illinois State Police, a fire investigator, a state's 19    attorney, an assistant state's attorney, a state's 20    attorney special investigator, or a judicial officer may 21    elect to furnish the address of the headquarters of the 22    governmental entity, police district, or business address 23    where he or she works instead of his or her domicile 24    address, in which case that address shall be deemed to be 25    his or her domicile address for all purposes under this   HB4084- 44 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    Chapter 3. The spouse and children of a person who may 2    elect under this paragraph 1 to furnish the address of the 3    headquarters of the government entity, police district, or 4    business address where the person works instead of the 5    person's domicile address may, if they reside with that 6    person, also elect to furnish the address of the 7    headquarters of the government entity, police district, or 8    business address where the person works as their domicile 9    address, in which case that address shall be deemed to be 10    their domicile address for all purposes under this Chapter 11    3. In this paragraph 1: (A) "police officer" has the 12    meaning ascribed to "policeman" in Section 10-3-1 of the 13    Illinois Municipal Code; (B) "deputy sheriff" means a 14    deputy sheriff appointed under Section 3-6008 of the 15    Counties Code; (C) "elected sheriff" means a sheriff 16    commissioned pursuant to Section 3-6001 of the Counties 17    Code; (D) "fire investigator" means a person classified as 18    a peace officer under the Peace Officer Fire Investigation 19    Act; (E) "state's attorney", "assistant state's attorney", 20    and "state's attorney special investigator" mean a state's 21    attorney, assistant state's attorney, and state's attorney 22    special investigator commissioned or appointed under 23    Division 3-9 of the Counties Code; and (F) "judicial 24    officer" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1-10 of 25    the Government Official Judicial Privacy Act.26        2. A description of the vehicle, including such   HB4084- 45 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    information as is required in an application for a 2    certificate of title, determined under such standard 3    rating as may be prescribed by the Secretary.4        3. (Blank). 5        3.5. A space for a voluntary disclosure of a condition 6    that impedes effective communication under Section 7    3-405.5. 8        4. Such further information as may reasonably be 9    required by the Secretary to enable him to determine 10    whether the vehicle is lawfully entitled to registration 11    and the owner entitled to a certificate of title.12        5. An affirmation by the applicant that all 13    information set forth is true and correct. If the 14    application is for the registration of a motor vehicle, 15    the applicant also shall affirm that the motor vehicle is 16    insured as required by this Code, that such insurance will 17    be maintained throughout the period for which the motor 18    vehicle shall be registered, and that neither the owner, 19    nor any person operating the motor vehicle with the 20    owner's permission, shall operate the motor vehicle unless 21    the required insurance is in effect. If the person signing 22    the affirmation is not the sole owner of the vehicle, such 23    person shall be deemed to have affirmed on behalf of all 24    the owners of the vehicle. If the person signing the 25    affirmation is not an owner of the vehicle, such person 26    shall be deemed to have affirmed on behalf of the owner or   HB4084- 46 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    owners of the vehicle. The lack of signature on the 2    application shall not in any manner exempt the owner or 3    owners from any provisions, requirements or penalties of 4    this Code. 5    (b) When such application refers to a new vehicle 6purchased from a dealer the application shall be accompanied 7by a Manufacturer's Statement of Origin from the dealer, and a 8statement showing any lien retained by the dealer.9(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1069, eff. 7-1-23.) 10    Section 25. The Judicial Privacy Act is amended by 11changing the heading of Article III by changing Sections 1-1, 121-5, 1-10, 2-1, 2-5, 2-10, and 3-1 as follows: 13    (705 ILCS 90/1-1)14    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 15Government Official Judicial Privacy Act.16(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.) 17    (705 ILCS 90/1-5)18    Sec. 1-5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to improve 19the safety and security of Illinois government officials 20judicial officers to ensure they are able to perform their 21official duties administer justice fairly without fear of 22personal reprisal from individuals affected by the decisions 23they make in the course of carrying out their public function.   HB4084- 47 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    This Act is not intended to restrain a government official 2judicial officer from independently making public his or her 3own personal information. Additionally, no government agency, 4person, business, or association has any obligation under this 5Act to protect the privacy of a government official's judicial 6officer's personal information until the government official 7judicial officer makes a written request that his or her 8personal information not be publicly posted. 9    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to impair free 10access to decisions and opinions expressed by government 11officials judicial officers in the course of carrying out 12their public functions. 13(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.) 14    (705 ILCS 90/1-10)15    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:16    "Executive officer" means the Governor, Lieutenant 17Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, Comptroller, 18Treasurer, and Auditor General. 19    "Government agency" includes all agencies, authorities, 20boards, commissions, departments, institutions, offices, and 21any other bodies politic and corporate of the State created by 22the constitution or statute, whether in the executive, 23judicial, or legislative branch; all units and corporate 24outgrowths created by executive order of the Governor or any 25constitutional officer, by the Supreme Court, or by resolution   HB4084- 48 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1of the General Assembly; or agencies, authorities, boards, 2commissions, departments, institutions, offices, and any other 3bodies politic and corporate of a unit of local government, or 4school district. 5    "Government official" includes any judicial officer, 6legislative officer, or executive officer. 7    "Legislative officer" means a State Senator or State 8Representative in the General Assembly. 9    "Home address" includes a government official's judicial 10officer's permanent residence and any secondary residences 11affirmatively identified by the government official judicial 12officer, but does not include a government official's judicial 13officer's work address. 14    "Immediate family" includes a government official's 15judicial officer's spouse, child, parent, or any blood 16relative of the judicial officer or the government official's 17judicial officer's spouse who lives in the same residence. 18    "Judicial officer" includes actively employed and former 19or deceased: 20        (1) Justices of the United States Supreme Court and 21    the Illinois Supreme Court;22        (2) Judges of the United States Court of Appeals;23        (3) Judges and magistrate judges of the United States 24    District Court;25        (4) Judges of the United States Bankruptcy Court;26        (5) Judges of the Illinois Appellate Court; and   HB4084- 49 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1        (6) Judges and associate judges of the Illinois 2    Circuit Courts. 3    "Personal information" means a home address, home 4telephone number, mobile telephone number, pager number, 5personal email address, social security number, federal tax 6identification number, checking and savings account numbers, 7credit card numbers, marital status, and identity of children 8under the age of 18. 9    "Publicly available content" means any written, printed, 10or electronic document or record that provides information or 11that serves as a document or record maintained, controlled, or 12in the possession of a government agency that may be obtained 13by any person or entity, from the Internet, from the 14government agency upon request either free of charge or for a 15fee, or in response to a request under the Freedom of 16Information Act.17    "Publicly post" or "publicly display" means to communicate 18to another or otherwise make available to the general public. 19    "Written request" means written notice signed by a 20government official judicial officer or a representative of 21the government official's judicial officer's employer 22requesting a government agency, person, business, or 23association to refrain from posting or displaying publicly 24available content that includes the government official's 25judicial officer's personal information. 26(Source: P.A. 100-98, eff. 8-11-17.)   HB4084- 50 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    (705 ILCS 90/2-1)2    Sec. 2-1. Publicly posting or displaying a government 3official's judicial officer's personal information by 4government agencies.5    (a) Government agencies shall not publicly post or display 6publicly available content that includes a government 7official's judicial officer's personal information, provided 8that the government agency has received a written request in 9accordance with Section 2-10 of this Act that it refrain from 10disclosing the government official's judicial officer's 11personal information. After a government agency has received a 12written request, that agency shall remove the government 13official's judicial officer's personal information from 14publicly available content within 5 business days. After the 15government agency has removed the government official's 16judicial officer's personal information from publicly 17available content, the agency shall not publicly post or 18display the information and the government official's judicial 19officer's personal information shall be exempt from the 20Freedom of Information Act unless the government agency has 21received consent from the government official judicial officer 22to make the personal information available to the public. 23    (b) Redress. If a government agency fails to comply with a 24written request to refrain from disclosing personal 25information, the government official judicial officer may   HB4084- 51 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1bring an action seeking injunctive or declaratory relief in 2any court of competent jurisdiction. 3(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.) 4    (705 ILCS 90/2-5)5    Sec. 2-5. Publicly posting a government official's 6judicial officer's personal information on the Internet by 7persons, businesses, and associations.8    (a) Prohibited Conduct. 9        (1) All persons, businesses, and associations shall 10    refrain from publicly posting or displaying on the 11    Internet publicly available content that includes a 12    government official's judicial officer's personal 13    information, provided that the government official 14    judicial officer has made a written request to the person, 15    business, or association that it refrain from disclosing 16    the personal information. 17        (2) No person, business, or association shall solicit, 18    sell, or trade on the Internet a government official's 19    judicial officer's personal information with the intent to 20    pose an imminent and serious threat to the health and 21    safety of the government official judicial officer or the 22    government official's judicial officer's immediate family. 23        (3) This subsection includes, but is not limited to, 24    Internet phone directories, Internet search engines, 25    Internet data aggregators, and Internet service providers.   HB4084- 52 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    (b) Required Conduct. 2        (1) After a person, business, or association has 3    received a written request from a government official 4    judicial officer to protect the privacy of the official's 5    officer's personal information, that person, business, or 6    association shall have 72 hours to remove the personal 7    information from the Internet. 8        (2) After a person, business, or association has 9    received a written request from a government official 10    judicial officer, that person, business, or association 11    shall ensure that the government official's judicial 12    officer's personal information is not made available on 13    any website or subsidiary website controlled by that 14    person, business, or association. 15        (3) After receiving a government official's judicial 16    officer's written request, no person, business, or 17    association shall transfer the government official's 18    judicial officer's personal information to any other 19    person, business, or association through any medium. 20    (c) Redress. 21        A government official judicial officer whose personal 22    information is made public as a result of a violation of 23    this Act may bring an action seeking injunctive or 24    declaratory relief in any court of competent jurisdiction. 25    If the court grants injunctive or declaratory relief, the 26    person, business, or association responsible for the   HB4084- 53 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    violation shall be required to pay the government 2    official's judicial officer's costs and reasonable 3    attorney's fees. 4(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.) 5    (705 ILCS 90/2-10)6    Sec. 2-10. Procedure for completing a written request.7    (a) Requirement that a government official judicial 8officer make a written request. No government agency, person, 9business, or association shall be found to have violated any 10provision of this Act if the government official judicial 11officer fails to submit a written request calling for the 12protection of the official's officer's personal information. 13    (b) Written request procedure. A written request shall be 14valid if: 15        (1) The government official judicial officer sends a 16    written request directly to a government agency, person, 17    business, or association; or18        (2) In the case of a judicial officer, if If the 19    Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts has a policy 20    and procedure for a state judicial officer to file the 21    written request with the Administrative Office to notify 22    government agencies, the state judicial officer may send 23    the written request to the Administrative Office of the 24    Illinois Courts. In each quarter of a calendar year, the 25    Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts shall provide   HB4084- 54 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1    a list of all state judicial officers who have submitted a 2    written request to it, to the appropriate officer with 3    ultimate supervisory authority for a government agency. 4    The officer shall promptly provide a copy of the list to 5    any and all government agencies under his or her 6    supervision. Receipt of the written request list compiled 7    by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts by a 8    government agency shall constitute a written request to 9    that Agency for the purposes of this Act.10    (c) A representative from the government official's 11judicial officer's employer may submit a written request on 12the government official's judicial officer's behalf, provided 13that the government official judicial officer gives written 14consent to the representative and provided that the 15representative agrees to furnish a copy of that consent when a 16written request is made. The representative shall submit the 17written request as provided in subsection (b) of this Section. 18    (d) Information to be included in the written request. A 19government official's judicial officer's written request shall 20specify what personal information shall be maintained private. 21    If a government official judicial officer wishes to 22identify a secondary residence as a home address as that term 23is defined in this Act, the designation shall be made in the 24written request. 25    A government official judicial officer shall disclose the 26identity of the official's officer's immediate family and   HB4084- 55 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1indicate that the personal information of these family members 2shall also be excluded to the extent that it could reasonably 3be expected to reveal the personal information of the 4government official judicial officer. 5    (e) Duration of the written request. A government 6official's judicial officer's written request is valid until 7the government official judicial officer provides the 8government agency, person, business, or association with 9written permission to release the private information. A 10government official's judicial officer's written request 11expires on death.12(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.) 13    (705 ILCS 90/3-1)14    Sec. 3-1. Unlawful publication of personal information. It 15is unlawful for any person to knowingly publicly post on the 16Internet the personal information of a government official 17judicial officer or of the government official's judicial 18officer's immediate family if the person knows or reasonably 19should know that publicly posting the personal information 20poses an imminent and serious threat to the health and safety 21of the government official judicial officer or the government 22official's judicial officer's immediate family, and the 23violation is a proximate cause of bodily injury or death of the 24government official judicial officer or a member of the 25government official's judicial officer's immediate family. A   HB4084- 56 -LRB104 14360 RLC 27494 b1person who violates this Section is guilty of a Class 3 felony. 2(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.)